Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.715

Savings.

The repeal of a statute by chapter 176, Laws of 2015 does not affect:

(1) The operation of the statute or any action taken under it before its repeal;

(2) Any ratification, right, remedy, privilege, obligation, or liability acquired, accrued, or incurred under the statute before its repeal;

(3) Any violation of the statute or any penalty, forfeiture, or punishment incurred because of the violation before its repeal; or

(4) Any proceeding, reorganization, or dissolution commenced under the statute before its repeal, and the proceeding, reorganization, or dissolution may be completed in accordance with the statute as if it had not been repealed.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1704.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.